Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2617
Program provider; communicable disease; notice to parents.

A provider of a program shall notify the parents of enrolled children of the outbreak of any communicable disease in any child in the program on the same day the provider is informed of or observes the outbreak. The Department of Health and Human Services shall develop appropriate procedures to carry out this section.

Laws 1991, LB 836, § 17;

Laws 1995, LB 401, § 17;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 228;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 98;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 151.